Nebraska, session 109, LB586.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB586 LB586
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 32-944, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-944 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Facility means any city or county jail, detention center,
assisted-living facility, nursing home, rehabilitation center, or
hospital that houses any restricted individual; and
(b) Restricted individual means any person who is unable to vote at
an in-person voting location because of an inability to travel.
(2) Each election commissioner or county clerk shall make efforts to
coordinate with the county sheriff or director or designated staff member
of each facility to facilitate voting for all restricted individuals who
are eligible voters.
(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall provide training
and technical assistance to the county sheriff or director or designated
staff member of each facility and shall use the materials distributed by
the Secretary of State to create an election plan.
(4) The election plan shall include the following information:
(a) How the election commissioner or county clerk will provide each
facility with voter information materials consistent with the materials
available to eligible voters not housed in such facilities, including a
list of acceptable forms of identification and voter registration
applications, and how the facility will ensure reasonable access to such
materials and information;
(b) The process by which the election commissioner or county clerk
and county sheriff or director or designated staff member of the facility
will facilitate voter registration, facilitate each of the services of
in-person voting, and deliver and retrieve the ballots of eligible
voters;
(c) How the county sheriff or director or designated staff member
will provide to eligible voters housed in the facility notice of the date
and time for voting at the facility and information regarding eligibility
-2-

LB586 LB586
2025 2025
to vote, how restricted individuals can verify or change their voter
registration, and how restricted individuals can register to vote if
eligible;
(d) How restricted individuals who want to verify or change their
voter registration or register to vote have reasonable access to do so;
(e) A location at the county jail or detention center for eligible
voters housed at such facilities to return ballots for collection by two
registered voters who are not affiliated with the same political party
and provide information to restricted individuals at such facilities
concerning the methods by which the ballots can be returned, the location
in the county jail or detention center where ballots can be returned, and
the deadlines for returning ballots; and
(f) The process for eligible voters housed at each facility to have
the opportunity to cure a deficiency on their ballots.
(5) The county sheriff or director or designated staff member of
each facility shall perform duties in accordance with the Election Act.
(6) The election commissioner or county clerk shall adopt procedures
to carry out this section in conformance with the Election Act and rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated by the Secretary of State.
(7) Any failure by the county sheriff or director or designated
staff member of a city or county jail to comply with the requirements of
this section shall be subject to a civil penalty to be determined by the
district court in which the county jail or detention center is located,
payable by the county.
The election commissioner or county clerk may train registered
voters to act on behalf of the election commissioner or county clerk in
administering a ballot to residents of nursing homes or hospitals who
have requested ballots. Ballots shall be administered by two registered
voters who are not affiliated with the same political party. The election
commissioner or county clerk shall adopt procedures to carry out this
section.
-3-

LB586 LB586
2025 2025
Sec. 2. Original section 32-944, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-